Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 2. Duties and Powers

§ 19-9-201.
Organization drill or training assemblies; pay and allowances generally.

There shall be organization drill or training assemblies when ordered by the adjutant general. While on duty under the authority of the United States department of defense, and in going to and returning therefrom, or for attendance at armory drill, members of the Wyoming national guard shall receive pay and allowances as allowed by the department of defense.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, § 27; R.S. 1931, § 73-127; C.S. 1945, § 30-129; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-32, 19-78.17; Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 17; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-401

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

Salaries. —

Compiled Statutes 1920, §§ 386, 387, specifying salaries of officers and enlisted men of national guard during encampments, did not provide a continuing appropriation, it being contemplated that each legislature should appropriate sufficient to meet the obligation. State ex rel. Davis v. Carter, 31 Wyo. 401, 226 P. 690,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1924).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of officer for injury from discharge of firearms by militiamen during military exercise, 49 ALR3d 762.

§ 19-9-202.
Annual field training generally.

The commander in chief shall order an encampment of the national guard for annual field training as provided in department of defense orders or national guard regulations. At least one (1) month notice of the encampment shall be given each organization commander by his commanding officer.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, § 28; R.S. 1931, § 73-128; C.S. 1945, § 30-130; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-34, 19-78.18; Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 18; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-402

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-9-203.
Establishing bounds for annual field training and other missions; entry without leave; disorderly conduct; interrupting, molesting, insulting or obstructing officer or soldier; penalties.

During an encampment for annual field training or when one (1) or more units of the national guard are engaged in a mission under lawful orders in an active state status, the commanding officer may fix certain bounds not including any public road within which no spectator may enter without leave. Whoever intrudes within such limits when forbidden to do so, or after entering with permission conducts himself in a disorderly manner, or resists a sentry or guard acting under orders to prevent the entry or to prevent disorderly conduct, may be arrested by the commanding officer or by his order and taken before a circuit court of the county. Upon conviction a person violating this subsection shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), confined in the county jail for up to six (6) months, or both.

Any person who interrupts, molests, insults by abusive words or behavior, or obstructs any member of the national guard while on duty on active state service or for drills, parades or other military duty, is guilty of a misdemeanor and in addition to prosecution for the offense may be immediately put under guard by the officer in command until the duty is concluded. Any civilian so placed under guard will be placed into the custody of the local county sheriff without delay. Upon conviction the person so offending shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), confined in the county jail for up to six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, § 29; R.S. 1931, § 73-129; C.S. 1945, § 30-131; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-35, 19-78.19; Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 19; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-403

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted “justice of the peace or” following “and taken before a.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, and application of 18 U.S.C. § 1382, prohibiting trespass on military installation, 12 ALR Fed 638.

§ 19-9-204.
Command of military force called into service.

The command of any military force called into service shall devolve upon the senior officer of such force unless otherwise specifically ordered by the commander in chief.

The national guard of the state may be ordered into the service of the United States by the president of the United States for any purpose for which he is authorized to use militia of the states by the constitution of the United States.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, §§ 13, 33; R.S. 1931, §§ 73-113, 73-133; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-114, 30-136; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-16, 19-19, 19-78.20, 19-78.21; Laws 1969, ch. 72, §§ 20, 21; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-404

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-9-205.
Status of national guard members upon discharge from federal service.

Members of the national guard of Wyoming ordered or called into federal service by the federal government, upon being discharged therefrom shall automatically resume their status in the national guard of Wyoming and continue to serve therein until the dates upon which their enlistments entered into prior to entry into federal service would have expired if uninterrupted.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, § 50; R.S. 1931, § 73-151; C.S. 1945, § 30-154; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-48, 19-78.22; Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 22; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-405

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Judicial review of military action with respect to type of discharge given serviceman, 4 ALR Fed 343.

§ 19-9-206.
Suppression of riots, invasions, insurrection.

The governor may order any commanding officer of any portion of the national guard within the limits of his jurisdiction to order his command to appear at a time and place designated to aid the civil authority to suppress violence and to support the law. The order of the governor shall designate the specific civil authority to whom the national guard units ordered to duty shall report, or in lieu of such designation, shall provide that the national guard units ordered to duty shall operate under the jurisdiction and control of the governor and adjutant general only. Orders from civil officers to any military commander shall specify only the work to be done or result to be attained, and shall not include the method to be employed. The military commander shall exercise his discretion and be the sole judge as to what means are necessary.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, § 34; R.S. 1931, § 73-134; C.S. 1945, § 30-137; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-20, 19-78.23; Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 23; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-406

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-9-207.
Suppressing tumult; preserving order, insuring public safety; expenses; creation of additional units; draft.

The governor may order any designated person or commanding officer of any military unit to appear with or without his command at a time and place specified to:

Aid in suppressing any tumult, riot, mob or invasion;

Assist in preserving order and insure the public safety in time of emergency when other civil agencies are unable to perform the function;

Insure public safety and assist in the protection of property or persons in times of fire, flood or other domestic catastrophe;

Perform such other duties as the commander in chief may require and which the militia or national guard may lawfully perform.

Any expense incurred under this or any other provision of law shall be borne by the state from the general funds until other provisions are made. Upon the declaration of war, the breaking out of insurrection, or the imminence of either, the governor may activate the Wyoming state guard by creating such additional units as he deems necessary. He may proceed in such manner as regulations prescribe for the drafting into the organized militia of all such portions of the militia of the state as he deems necessary in any such emergency.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 64, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 5429; C.S. 1910, § 6300; C.S. 1920, § 7596; R.S. 1931, § 73-135; C.S. 1945, § 30-138; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-21, 19-78.24; Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 24; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-407

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Prosecutions of inmates of state or local penal institutions for crime of riot, 39 ALR4th 1170.

§ 19-9-208.
Right-of-way for troops.

Troops or forces of the United States or the national guard of Wyoming parading or performing any duty according to law, have the right-of-way in any street or highway through which they may pass but carriage of the United States mails, legitimate functions of the police and operations of fire departments shall not be unnecessarily interfered with.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, § 46; R.S. 1931, § 73-147; C.S. 1945, § 30-150; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-38, 19-78.25; Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 25; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-408

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-9-209.
Service in state; active duty status outside of state; costs to state.

The governor, upon the written request of the governor of any other state, may order any member or unit of the national guard into state active duty for the benefit of another state, for periods of time not to exceed ninety (90) days.

Members ordered into state active duty pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall:

Receive the same pay and allowances as though their service is within this state; and

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 59, § 2.

Remain subject to recall by the governor of this state.

All privileges and immunities from liability, exemptions from law, ordinances and rules and all pension, disability relief and workers compensation benefits that apply when performing functions within the territorial limits of the state apply to the same extent while engaged in the performance of any functions and duties extraterritorially.

Except for assistance provided in accordance with the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, the service of members to the requesting state shall be at no cost to the state of Wyoming and all expenses incurred by the state of Wyoming shall be the responsibility of the requesting state. For assistance provided in accordance with the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, the allocation of expenses incurred by the state shall be determined by the governor of this state and the legal representatives of other party states as provided in W.S.

19-13-410

of that compact.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1; 2003, ch. 21, § 2; 2006, ch. 59, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to the Emergency Management Assistance Compact Act, see §

19-13-401

et seq.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, repealed (b)(ii), which read: “Not be placed under arms nor assigned law enforcement missions; and”; and made a related change in (b)(i).

§ 19-9-210.
State active duty without pay.

Members of the Wyoming national guard may voluntarily request to be placed upon orders for state active duty, without pay, when assistance has been requested from an agency or political subdivision of this state or the federal government and such assistance has been approved by the adjutant general. Members shall receive from the requesting agency pay and allowances equal to the greater of their military pay or that of civilians employed by the requesting agency in the same or similar positions and reimbursement of uncompensated medical expenses as provided in W.S. 19-9-403(a).

When serving on state active duty, without pay, members shall be deemed state employees for the purpose of being covered under the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act and their state active duty shall be considered an extrahazardous occupation under W.S.

27-14-108

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1; 2003, ch. 19, § 1; 2010, ch. 95, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “and reimbursement of uncompensated medical expenses as provided in W.S. 19-9-403(a)” in (a).

§ 19-9-211.
The National Guard Mutual Assistance Counter-Drug Activities Compact.

The National Guard Mutual Assistance Counter-Drug Activities Compact as contained herein is hereby enacted into law and entered into on behalf of this state with any and all other states legally joining therein in a form substantially as follows:

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

The National Guard Mutual Assistance
Counter-Drug Activities Compact

ARTICLE I Purpose

The purposes of this compact are to:

Provide for mutual assistance and support among the party states in the utilization of the national guard in drug interdiction, counter-drug, and demand reduction activities;

Permit the national guard of this state to enter into mutual assistance and support agreements, on the basis of need, with one (1) or more law enforcement agencies operating within this state, for activities within this state, or with a national guard of one (1) or more other states, whether said activities are within or without this state in order to facilitate and coordinate efficient, cooperative enforcement efforts directed toward drug interdiction, counter-drug activities, and demand reduction;

Permit the national guard of this state to act as a receiving and responding state as defined within this compact and to ensure the prompt and effective delivery of national guard personnel, assets and service to agencies or areas that are in need of increased support and presence;

Permit and encourage a high degree of flexibility in the deployment of national guard forces in the interest of efficiency;

Maximize the effectiveness of the national guard in those situations which call for its utilization under this compact;

Provide protection for the rights of national guard personnel when performing duties in other states in counter-drug activities; and

Ensure uniformity of state laws in the area of national guard involvement in interstate counter-drug activities by incorporating said uniform laws within the compact.

ARTICLE II. Entry into Force and Withdrawals

This compact shall go into force when enacted into law by any two (2) states. Thereafter, this compact shall become effective as to any other state upon its enactment thereof.

Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until one (1) year after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to the governors of all other party states.

ARTICLE III. Mutual Assistance and Support

As used in this article:

“Drug interdiction and counter-drug activities” means the use of national guard personnel, while not in federal service, in any law enforcement support activities that are intended to reduce the supply or use of illegal drugs in the United States. These activities include, but are not limited to:

Providing information obtained during either the normal course of military training or operations or during counter-drug activities, to federal, state or local law enforcement officials that may be relevant to a violation of any federal or state law within the jurisdiction of such officials;

Making available any equipment, including associated supplies or spare parts, base facilities or research facilities of the national guard to any federal, state or local civilian law enforcement official for law enforcement purposes, in accordance with other applicable law or regulation;

Providing available national guard personnel to train federal, state or local civilian law enforcement in the operation and maintenance of equipment, including equipment made available above, in accordance with other applicable law;

Providing available national guard personnel to operate and maintain equipment provided to federal, state or local law enforcement officials pursuant to activities defined and referred to in this compact;

Operation and maintenance of equipment and facilities of the national guard or other law enforcement agencies used for the purposes of drug interdiction and counter-drug activities;

Providing available national guard personnel to operate equipment for the detection, monitoring and communication of the movement of air, land and sea traffic, to facilitate communications in connection with law enforcement programs, to provide transportation for civilian law enforcement personnel and to operate bases of operations for civilian-law enforcement personnel;

Providing available national guard personnel, equipment and support for administrative, interpretive, analytic or other purposes;

Providing available national guard personnel and equipment to aid federal, state and local officials and agencies otherwise involved in the prosecution or incarceration of individuals processed within the criminal justice system who have been arrested for criminal acts involving the use, distribution or transportation of controlled substances as defined in 21 U.S.C. 801 et seq. or other applicable law.

“Demand reduction” means providing available national guard personnel, equipment, support and coordination to federal, state, local and civic organizations, institutions and agencies for the purposes of the prevention of drug abuse and the reduction in the demand for illegal drugs;

“Law enforcement agency” means a lawfully established federal, state or local public agency that is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of penal, traffic, regulatory, game, immigration, postal, customs or controlled substances laws;

“Mutual assistance and support agreement” or “agreement” means an agreement between the national guard of this state and one (1) or more law enforcement agencies or between the national guard of this state and the national guard of one (1) or more other states, consistent with the purposes of this compact;

“Official” means the appointed, elected, designated or otherwise duly selected representative of an agency, institution or organization authorized to conduct those activities for which support is requested;

“Party state” refers to a state that has lawfully enacted this compact;

“Requesting state” means the state whose governor requested assistance in the area of counter-drug activities;

“Responding state” means the state furnishing assistance or requested to furnish assistance in the area of counter-drug activities; and

“State” means any of the several states of the United States, the District of Columbia, the commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or possession of the United States.

Upon the request of a governor of a party state for assistance in the area of drug interdiction, counter-drug and demand reduction activities, the governor of a responding state shall have authority under this compact to send without the borders of his or her state and place under the temporary operational control of the appropriate national guard or other military authorities of the requesting state, for the purposes of providing such requested assistance, all or any part of the national guard forces of his state as he may deem necessary, and the exercise of his discretion in this regard shall be conclusive.

The governor of a party state may, within his discretion, withhold the national guard forces of his state from such use and recall any forces or part or member thereof previously deployed in a requesting state.

The national guard of this state is hereby authorized to engage in counter-drug activities and demand reduction.

The adjutant general of this state, in order to further the purposes of this compact, may enter into a mutual assistance and support agreement with one (1) or more law enforcement agencies of this state, including federal law enforcement agencies operating within this state, or with the national guard of one (1) or more other party states to provide personnel, assets and services in the area of counter-drug activities, and demand reduction provided that all parties to the agreement are not specifically prohibited by law to perform said activities.

The agreement must set forth the powers, rights and obligations of the parties to the agreement, where applicable, as follows:

Its duration;

The organization, composition and nature of any separate legal entity created thereby;

The purpose of the agreement;

The manner of financing the agreement and establishing and maintaining its budget;

The method to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination;

Provision for administering the agreement, which may include creation of a joint board responsible for such administration;

The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and personal property used pursuant to the agreement, if necessary;

The minimum standards for national guard personnel implementing the provisions of the agreement;

The minimum insurance required of each party to the agreement;

The chain of command or delegation of authority to be followed by national guard personnel acting under the provisions of the agreement;

The duties and authority that the national guard personnel of each party state may exercise; and

Any other necessary and proper matters.

Agreements prepared under the provisions of this section are exempt from any general law pertaining to intergovernmental agreements.

As a condition precedent to an agreement becoming effective under this section, the agreement shall be submitted to and receive the approval of the attorney general of Wyoming. The attorney general may delegate his approval authority to the appropriate attorney for the national guard subject to those conditions which he decides are appropriate. The delegation shall be in writing and be subject to the following:

The attorney general, or his agent, shall approve an agreement submitted to him under this subsection unless he finds that it is not in proper form, does not meet the requirements set forth in this subsection or otherwise does not conform to the laws of Wyoming. If the attorney general disapproves an agreement, he shall provide a written explanation to the adjutant general of the national guard;

If the attorney general, or his agent, does not disapprove an agreement within thirty (30) days after its submission to him, it is considered approved by him.

Whenever national guard forces of any party state are engaged in the performance of duties in the area of drug interdiction, counter-drug and demand reduction activities pursuant to orders, no member thereof shall be held personally liable for any acts or omissions which occur during the performance of their duty.

ARTICLE IV.
Responsibilities

Nothing in this compact shall be construed as a waiver of any benefits, privileges, immunities or rights otherwise provided for national guard personnel performing duty pursuant to title 32 of the United States Code nor shall anything in this compact be construed as a waiver of coverage provided for under the Federal Tort Claims Act. In the event that national guard personnel performing counter-drug activities do not receive rights, benefits, privileges and immunities otherwise provided for national guard personnel as stated above, the following provisions shall apply:

Whenever national guard forces of any responding state are engaged in another state in carrying out the purposes of this compact, the members thereof so engaged shall have the same power, duties, rights, privileges and immunities as members of national guard forces of the requesting state. The requesting state shall save and hold members of the national guard forces of this responding state harmless from civil liability, except as otherwise provided herein, for acts or omissions which occur in the performance of their duty while engaged in carrying out the purposes of this compact, whether responding forces are serving the requesting state within the borders of the responding state or are attached to the requesting state for purposes of operational control;

Subject to the paragraphs (a)(iii), (iv) and (v) of this article, all liability that may arise under the laws of the requesting state or the responding state, on account of or in connection with a request for assistance or support shall be assumed and borne by the requesting state;

Any responding state rendering aid or assistance pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the requesting state for any loss, damage to or expense incurred in the operation of any equipment answering a request for aid and for the cost of the materials, transportation and maintenance of national guard personnel and equipment incurred in connection with such request, provided that nothing contained herein shall prevent any responding state from assuming such loss, damage, expense or other cost;

Unless there is a written agreement to the contrary, each party shall provide in the same amounts and manner as if they were on duty within their state for pay and allowances of personnel of its national guard units while engaged without the state pursuant to this compact and while going to and returning from such duty pursuant to this compact;

Each party state providing for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members and the representatives of deceased members of its national guard forces in case such members sustain injuries or are killed within their own state, shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits in the same manner and on the same terms in the event such members sustain injury or are killed while rendering assistance or support pursuant to this compact. Such benefits and compensation shall be deemed items of expense reimbursable pursuant to paragraph (a)(iii) of this article.

Officers and enlisted personnel of the national guard performing duties subject to proper orders pursuant to this compact shall be subject to and governed by the provisions of their home state code of military justice whether they are performing duties within or without their home state. In the event that any national guard member commits, or is suspected of committing, a criminal offense while performing duties pursuant to this compact without his home state, he may be returned immediately to his home state and the home state shall be responsible for any disciplinary action. Nothing in this section shall abrogate the general criminal jurisdiction of the state in which the offense occurred.

ARTICLE V. Delegation

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prevent the governor of a party state from delegating any of his responsibilities or authority respecting the national guard, provided that such delegation is otherwise in accordance with law. For purposes of this compact the governor shall not delegate the power to request assistance from another state.

ARTICLE VI.
Limitations

Nothing in this compact shall:

Authorize or permit national guard units or personnel to be placed under the operational control of any person not having the national guard rank or status required by law for that command;

Deprive a properly convened court of jurisdiction over an offense or a defendant merely because of the fact that the national guard, while performing duties pursuant to this compact, was utilized in achieving an arrest or indictment; or

Authorize the national guard to engage in the personal apprehension, arrest and incarceration of any individual or the physical search and seizure of any person. The national guard may indirectly support any such law-enforcement activities by an otherwise appropriate law-enforcement agency. The national guard may, however, directly or indirectly engage in the legal search and seizure of any property when under the supervision of an otherwise appropriate law-enforcement agency.

ARTICLE VII.
Construction and Severability

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of the United States or of any state or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or the circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating herein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining part states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

Editor’s notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in articles I and VI and no subsection (i) in article III in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Federal Tort Claims Act. —

The federal Tort Claims Act, referred to in Article IV, is codified as 28 U.S.C.S. 2671 et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Use of trained dog to detect narcotics or drugs as unreasonable search in violation of fourth amendment, 150 ALR Fed 399.

§ 19-9-212.
Governor’s authority to order service under Title 32 of the United States Code.

The governor may order any member of the national guard of Wyoming to duty under Title 32 of the United States Code, to respond to either natural or man made emergencies within Wyoming, to support national wildland fire response or to respond to requests originated in accordance with W.S.

19-9-209

. This section is meant to clarify the governor’s authority under Title 32 and is not intended to limit the governor’s inherent authority as the commander in chief of the national guard.

History:

2014 ch. 104, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 104, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const.. Approved March 10, 2014.